Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1110
Officers; alternate; changing appointment; duty to be informed.

Until such time as an alternate is authorized to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an officer, as provided in sections 84-1101 to 84-1116, he shall serve as alternate at the pleasure of the officer by whom he was appointed, and may be removed or replaced thereby, or his rank in order of succession changed, at any time, with or without cause. Every alternate shall keep himself generally informed as to the powers, functions, duties, procedures, practices, and current business of the officer to whose powers and duties he is designated to succeed, and all officers shall assist their alternates in keeping themselves so informed.

Laws 1959, c. 457, § 10, p. 1520.